District of Columbia statutes.
42-3214

Landlord’s lien for rent — How enforced.

The said lien may be enforced:

(1)

By attachment, to be issued upon affidavit that the rent is due and unpaid; or, if it be not due, that the defendant is about to remove or sell some part of said chattels;

(2)

By judgment against the tenant and execution, to be levied on said chattels, or any of them, in whosesoever hands they may be found;

(3)

By action against any purchaser of said chattels, with notice of the lien, in which action the plaintiff may have judgment for the value of the chattels purchased by the defendant not exceeding the rent in arrear.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1383, ch. 854, § 1230

History

1981 Ed., § 45-1414.
1973 Ed., § 45-916.

Prior Codifications